District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0772.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Closing of the Unimproved Portion of 35th Street N.W., Abutting
Squares 1178 and 1179, S.O. 26-01008, Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2 Pursuant to section 404 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 787; D.C. Official Code §1-204.04), and consistent with the Street
and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law
4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-201.01 et seq.), the Council finds that the unimproved portion of
35th Street, N.W., abutting Squares 1178 and 1179, as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under
S.O. 26-01008, is unnecessary for street purposes and orders it closed, with title to the land to
vest as shown on the Surveyor’s plat.
Sec. 3. Transmittal.
The Council shall transmit a copy of this act, upon its effective date, to the Office of the
Surveyor of the District of Columbia and the Office of the Recorder of Deeds.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).

Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect upon its approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 603(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).